test/src/morphology/N-vonj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vȯņ: # Noun 127 'eng /est õnn/fin' - full paradigm
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Nom: vȯņ
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Gen: vȯn
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Par: vȯnnõ
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Dat: vȯnnõn
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Ins: vȯnnõks
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Ill: vȯnnõ
     vȯņ+N+Sg+Ela: vȯnstõ
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Nom: vȯnnõd
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Gen: vȯnnõd
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Par: vȱnidi
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Dat: vȯnnõdõn
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Ins: vȯnnõdõks
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Ill: vȯņņiž
     vȯņ+N+Pl+Ela: vȯņņist
